District of Columbia, session 26, B26-0603.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE COUNCIL OF THE DISTRICT OF COLUMBIA, That this act may
be cited as the “Body-Worn Camera Transparency for Use of Force Amendment Act of
2026”.
Sec. 2. Section 3004 of the Body-Worn Camera Regulation and Reporting Requirements
Act of 2015, effective October 22, 2015 (D.C. Law 21-36; D.C. Official Code § 5-116.33), is
amended as follows:
(a) Subsection c(2)(A) is amended as follows:
(1) Sub-subparagraph (i)(I) is amended to read as follows:
“(I) The names and body-worn camera recordings of all
Metropolitan Police Department officers as well as the names, as available, of all other law
enforcement officers directly involved in the officer-involved death or serious use of force; and”.

(2) Sub-subparagraph (ii) is amended by striking the phrase “; and” and inserting
the phrase “, provided that for all officer-involved deaths since January 1, 2026, the information
reported pursuant to this sub-subparagraph shall include the names of all Metropolitan Police
Department officers, as well as the names of other law enforcement officers, as available,
directly involved in the officer-involved death; and” in its place.
(b) Subsection (e)(1) is amended by striking the phrase “serious use of force” and
inserting the phrase “serious use of force directly involving an MPD officer” in its place.
(c) Subsection (g)(3) is amended as follows:
(1) Subparagraph (A) is amended by striking the phrase “Metropolitan Police
Department officer” and inserting the phrase “Metropolitan Police Department officer, or any
other law enforcement officer while an MPD officer is present” in its place.
(2) Subparagraph (B) is amended by striking the phrase “Metropolitan Police
Department officer” and inserting the phrase “Metropolitan Police Department officer, or any
other law enforcement officer while an MPD officer is present” in its place.
(3) Subparagraph (C) is amended by striking the phrase “Metropolitan Police
Department officer” and inserting the phrase “Metropolitan Police Department officer, or any
other law enforcement officer while an MPD officer is present” in its place.
(4) Subparagraph (D) is amended by striking the phrase “Metropolitan Police
Department canine” and inserting the phrase “Metropolitan Police Department canine, or canine
of any other law enforcement officer while an MPD officer is present” in its place.
Sec. 3. (a) Beginning on the effective date of this Act, the Metropolitan Police
Department shall record the following information for all law enforcement officers, other than
MPD officers, present at roll call:

(1) Full name;
(2) Badge identification number or other identifying number;
(3) Law enforcement agency represented; and
(4) Assignment for the shift.
(b) The Department shall make the information recorded pursuant to subsection (a) of
this section available to the Chairperson of the Council Committee with jurisdiction over the
Metropolitan Police Department (“Chairperson”) upon request within 5 business days of such
request.
(c) The Department shall provide aggregate information regarding paragraphs (3) and (4)
of subsection (a) of this section available to the public upon request by the Chairperson within 5
business days of such request.
Sec. 3. Fiscal impact statement.
The Council adopts the fiscal impact statement in the committee report as the fiscal
impact statement required by section 4a of the General Legislative Procedures Act of 1975,
approved October 16, 2006 (120 Stat. 2038; D.C. Official Code § 1-301.47a).
Sec. 4. Effective date.
This act shall take effect after approval by the Mayor (or in the event of veto by the
Mayor, action by the Council to override the veto), a 30-day period of congressional review as
provided in section 602(c)(1) of the District of Columbia Home Rule Act, approved December
24, 1973 (87 Stat. 813; D.C. Official Code § 1-206.02(c)(1)), and publication in the District of
Columbia Register.